Washington statutes.
RCW 1.20.170

State waterfall.

Palouse falls is hereby designated as the official waterfall of the state of Washington.

[ 2014 c 41 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—2014 c 41: "(1) The tourist industry is a vital part of the state's economy. Palouse falls has visitors numbering averaging over eighty thousand to one hundred thousand per year. The falls drop one hundred ninety-eight feet identifying them as the last remaining year-round waterfalls left by the ice age floods.

(2) Palouse falls was named sixth on the top ten best United States waterfalls list, tenth on the list of the world's most amazing waterfalls, and the site of the world record-breaking kayak drop.

(3) Palouse falls surrounding area is the location for the oldest documented remains found in the western hemisphere; home of the Palouse Native American culture; birthplace of the Appaloosa horse; and documented in Lewis and Clark's journals." [ 2014 c 41 s 1.]